Illinois, session 104th, SB1037.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Infant/Early Childhood Mental Health 5Consultations Act is amended by changing Section 35-1 as 6follows: 7    (405 ILCS 47/35-1)8    Sec. 35-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 9the Infant/Early Childhood Mental Health Consultations Act. 10References in this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.11(Source: P.A. 101-654, eff. 3-8-21.)